Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.020

Definitions.

When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise clearly requires:

(1) "Board" means the state board of nursing home administrators representative of the professions and institutions concerned with the care of the chronically ill and infirm aged patients.

(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(3) "Nursing home" means any facility or portion thereof licensed under state law as a nursing home.

(4) "Nursing home administrator" means an individual qualified by education, experience, training, and examination to administer a nursing home. A nursing home administrator administering a nursing home must be in active administrative charge as defined by the board. Nothing in this definition or this chapter shall be construed to prevent any person, so long as he or she is otherwise qualified, from obtaining and maintaining a license even though he or she has not administered or does not continue to administer a nursing home.

[ 1992 c 53 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 116; 1979 c 158 s 44; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 2.]